District of Columbia statutes.
24-925

Evaluation process.

The Director shall establish a system of evaluating the eligible juvenile offenders, with the purpose of obtaining an objective assessment of each eligible juvenile offender’s progress in the BOOT CAMP. The system of evaluation may include weekly evaluations by drill instructors, academic and vocational teachers, substance abuse counselors, and recreation leaders. The results of these evaluations may be used in determining the juvenile offender’s eligibility for conditional release or unconditional discharge at the end of the BOOT CAMP.

History

Jan. 27, 1994, D.C. Law 10-67, § 204, 40 DCR 5768

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-825.